Hawaii, session 2026, SB2414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The disability and communication access board shall conduct a study of the communication needs of individuals who are deaf, hard-of-hearing, and deaf-blind in health care settings.  The study shall include consideration of: (1)  The availability in the State of sign language interpreters, tactile interpreters, and other services and auxiliary aids that serve the needs of the State's deaf, hard-of-hearing, and deaf-blind communities; (2)  The patients' preferences; (3)  Any special communication needs of in-patients in hospitals and skilled nursing facilities who are deaf, hard-of-hearing, and deaf-blind; (4)  The legal duty for health care providers to provide patients who are deaf, hard-of-hearing, or deaf-blind with auxiliary aids and services, including qualified sign language interpreters, to ensure effective communication; and (5)  Any recommended revisions to the current guidance for health care providers to ensure effective communication that better addresses the needs of patients who are deaf, hard-of-hearing, or deaf-blind. SECTION 2. The disability and communication access board shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________